Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6888YC (5) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 602.1209B Electronic court 1 notification system. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âEnrolled individualsâ means: 4 (1) Every person who receives a citation, is arrested, or 5 otherwise enters any criminal justice proceeding after the 6 establishment of an opt-out electronic court notification 7 system by the state court administrator. 8 (2) Every person who is a victim or witness associated with 9 a criminal justice proceeding. 10 (3) Any attorney representing a person in a criminal justice 11 proceeding or a legal guardian of a person involved in a 12 criminal justice proceeding. 13 b. âOpt-out electronic court notification systemâ means a 14 system designed and operated to inform enrolled individuals 15 through electronic, text-based notifications for criminal cases 16 in which such individuals are involved. 17 2. The state court administrator shall, by July 1, 2027, 18 establish an opt-out electronic court notification system for 19 all pending and future criminal case actions. The system shall 20 meet all of the following requirements: 21 a. Deliver text-based notifications to enrolled individuals 22 regarding all public case proceedings and events, including 23 appearance reminders containing the date, time, and location, 24 and notification of fees due and methods of payment. 25 b. Provide enrolled individuals with a clear and simple 26 option to opt out of receiving notifications through the 27 electronic court notification system. 28 c. Protect against the disclosure of nonpublic information, 29 including information filed in cases under seal. 30 d. Limit participation in the electronic court notification 31 system to enrolled individuals. 32 3. The electronic court notification system may be operated 33 by the Iowa judicial branch or be operated under a contract 34 with a qualified third-party entity that meets the requirements 35 -1- LSB 6888YC (5) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. _____ of this section. 1